Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.120

Criminal profiteering lien—Authority, procedures.

(1) The state, upon filing a criminal action under RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 or for an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, or a civil action under RCW 9A.82.100, may file in accordance with this section a criminal profiteering lien. A filing fee or other charge is not required for filing a criminal profiteering lien.

(2) A criminal profiteering lien shall be signed by the attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney representing the state in the action and shall set forth the following information:

(a) The name of the defendant whose property or other interests are to be subject to the lien;

(b) In the discretion of the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, any aliases or fictitious names of the defendant named in the lien;

(c) If known to the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, the present residence or principal place of business of the person named in the lien;

(d) A reference to the proceeding pursuant to which the lien is filed, including the name of the court, the title of the action, and the court's file number for the proceeding;

(e) The name and address of the attorney representing the state in the proceeding pursuant to which the lien is filed;

(f) A statement that the notice is being filed pursuant to this section;

(g) The amount that the state claims in the action or, with respect to property or other interests that the state has requested forfeiture to the state or county, a description of the property or interests sought to be paid or forfeited;

(h) If known to the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien, a description of property that is subject to forfeiture to the state or property in which the defendant has an interest that is available to satisfy a judgment entered in favor of the state; and

(i) Such other information as the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney filing the lien deems appropriate.

(3) The attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien may amend a lien filed under this section at any time by filing an amended criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section that identifies the prior lien amended.

(4) The attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney filing the lien shall, as soon as practical after filing a criminal profiteering lien, furnish to any person named in the lien a notice of the filing of the lien. Failure to furnish notice under this subsection does not invalidate or otherwise affect a criminal profiteering lien filed in accordance with this section.

(5)(a) A criminal profiteering lien is perfected against interests in personal property in the same manner as a security interest in like property pursuant to RCW 62A.9A-301 through 62A.9A-316 or as otherwise required to perfect a security interest in like property under applicable law. In the case of perfection by filing, the state shall file, in lieu of a financing statement in the form prescribed by RCW 62A.9A-502, a notice of lien in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF LIEN

Pursuant to RCW 9A.82.120, the state of Washington claims a criminal profiteering lien on all real and personal property of:

Name:

. . . .

Address:

. . . .

. . . .

State of Washington

. . . .

By (authorized signature)

On receipt of such a notice from the state, a filing officer shall, without payment of filing fee, file and index the notice as if it were a financing statement naming the state as secured party and the defendant as debtor.

(b) A criminal profiteering lien is perfected against interests in real property by filing the lien in the office where a mortgage on the real estate would be filed or recorded. The filing officer shall file and index the criminal profiteering lien, without payment of a filing fee, in the same manner as a mortgage.

(6) The filing of a criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section creates a lien in favor of the state in:

(a) Any interest of the defendant, in real property situated in the county in which the lien is filed, then maintained, or thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in the lien;

(b) Any interest of the defendant, in personal property situated in this state, then maintained or thereafter acquired in the name of the defendant identified in the lien; and

(c) Any property identified in the lien to the extent of the defendant's interest therein.

(7) The lien created in favor of the state in accordance with this section, when filed or otherwise perfected as provided in subsection (5) of this section, has, with respect to any of the property described in subsection (6) of this section, the same priority determined pursuant to the laws of this state as a mortgage or security interest given for value (but not a purchase money security interest) and perfected in the same manner with respect to such property; except that any lien perfected pursuant to Title 60 RCW by any person who, in the ordinary course of his or her business, furnishes labor, services, or materials, or rents, leases, or otherwise supplies equipment, without knowledge of the criminal profiteering lien, is superior to the criminal profiteering lien.

(8) Upon entry of judgment in favor of the state, the state may proceed to execute thereon as in the case of any other judgment, except that in order to preserve the state's lien priority as provided in this section the state shall, in addition to such other notice as is required by law, give at least thirty days' notice of the execution to any person possessing at the time the notice is given, an interest recorded subsequent to the date the state's lien was perfected.

(9) Upon the entry of a final judgment in favor of the state providing for forfeiture of property to the state, the title of the state to the property:

(a) In the case of real property or a beneficial interest in real property, relates back to the date of filing the criminal profiteering lien or, if no criminal profiteering lien is filed, then to the date of recording of the final judgment or the abstract thereof; or

(b) In the case of personal property or a beneficial interest in personal property, relates back to the date the personal property was seized by the state, or the date of filing of a criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this section, whichever is earlier, but if the property was not seized and no criminal profiteering lien was filed then to the date the final judgment was filed with the department of licensing and, if the personal property is an aircraft, with the federal aviation administration.

(10) This section does not limit the right of the state to obtain any order or injunction, receivership, writ, attachment, garnishment, or other remedy authorized under RCW 9A.82.100 or appropriate to protect the interests of the state or available under other applicable law.

(11) In a civil or criminal action under this chapter, the superior court shall provide for the protection of bona fide interests in property, including community property, subject to liens of persons who were not involved in the violation of this chapter, except to the extent that such interests or property were acquired or used in such a way as to be subject to forfeiture pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f).

[ 2003 c 267 s 7; 2001 c 222 s 16. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 13; 1984 c 270 s 12.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.